District of Columbia statutes.
2-351.02

Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless superseded by the particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code, and laws relative to capacity to contract, agency, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, or bankruptcy, shall supplement the provisions of this chapter.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 102, 58 DCR 1185
This section is referenced in § 2-351.05.
2001 Ed., § 2-301.02.